Arkansas, session 2025, HB1858.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 15, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-15-103. Screening for Type 1 diabetes — Legislative findings.
(a) The General Assembly finds that pediatricians do not regularly
screen for Type 1 diabetes and often the diagnosis is only discovered due to
an emergency hospitalization.
(b) A pediatrician shall screen for Type 1 diabetes during the yearly
well-child visit beginning at three (3) years of age.
(c) The screening under subsection (b) of this section shall include a
hemoglobin A1c testing, blood sugar testing, and further antibody testing if
the pediatrician determines the antibody testing is necessary or if there is
a family history of Type 1 diabetes.
*JMB517*
03/19/2025 2:21:11 PM JMB517

HB1858

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-155. Screening for Type 1 diabetes.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall cover screening for Type 1
diabetes under § 20-15-103.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, Subchapter 1 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-79-170. Coverage of Type 1 diabetes screening — Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section, “health benefit plan” means:
(A) An individual, blanket, or group plan, policy, or
contract for healthcare services issued or delivered by an insurer, health
maintenance organization, hospital medical service corporation, or self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state; and
(B) Any health benefit program receiving state or federal
appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas Medicaid
Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, or any
successor program.
(2) As used in this section, “health benefit plan” includes:
(A) An indemnity and managed care plan; and
(B) A nonfederal governmental plan as defined in 29 U.S.C.
§ 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(3) As used in this section, “health benefit plan” does not
include:
(A) A disability income plan;
(B) A credit insurance plan;
(C) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to liability
insurance;
(D) Medical payments under an automobile or homeowner's
insurance plan;
(E) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
03/19/2025 2:21:11 PM JMB517

HB1858
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(F) A plan that provides only indemnity for hospital
confinement;
(G) An accident-only plan;
(H) A specified disease plan; or
(I) A long-term-care-only plan.
(b) A health benefit plan that is offered, issued, or renewed in this
state shall provide coverage for Type 1 diabetes screening under § 20-15-103
by a pediatrician on or after January 1, 2026.



























03/19/2025 2:21:11 PM JMB517